District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Closing of a Cul-de-Sac in Square 4350, S.O. 22-05506, Emergency Act
of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 404 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 787; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.04), and consistent with the Street
and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law
4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-201.01 et seq.), the Council finds that the cul-de-sac in Square
4350, as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 22-05506, is unnecessary for alley
purposes and orders it closed, with title to the land to vest as shown on the Surveyor’s plat.
Sec. 3. The closing of the cul-de-sac described in section 2 is contingent upon the
satisfaction of all conditions set forth in the official file for S.O. 22-05506 prior to the
recordation of the plat by the Surveyor.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of a veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
than 90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in
section 412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87
Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2